Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.490

Amendments to articles of incorporation.

(1) Amendments to the articles of incorporation of the converted savings bank shall be made only with the approvals of the director, of two-thirds of the directors of the savings bank, and of the holders of a majority of each class of the outstanding shares of capital stock or such greater percentage of these shares as may be specified in the articles of the converted savings bank.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the board of directors of a savings bank may, by majority vote, amend the savings bank's articles of incorporation as provided in this section without shareholder action:

(a) If the savings bank has only one class of shares outstanding, to provide, change, or eliminate any provision with respect to the par value of any class of shares;

(b) To delete the name and address of the initial directors;

(c) If the savings bank has only one class of shares outstanding, solely to change the number of authorized shares to effectuate a split of, or stock dividend in, the savings bank's own shares, or solely to do so and to change the number of authorized shares in proportion thereto;

(d) To change the savings bank's name; or

(e) To make any other change expressly permitted by this title to be made without shareholder action.

[ 1994 c 256 s 109; 1994 c 92 s 402; 1985 c 56 s 28; 1981 c 85 s 97.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 92 s 402 and by 1994 c 256 s 109, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.